Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [125A.081] DUE PROCESS DAYS AND AID. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Due process forms and procedure days. new text end new text begin Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, a school district must use the revenue under this section to provide teachers time to complete due process forms and procedures in accordance with the plan developed under subdivision 2. This time is in addition to the preparation time under section 122A.50. For purposes of this section, "school district" includes a charter school or cooperative unit where teachers have an exclusive representative for purposes of collective bargaining. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Plan. new text end new text begin (a) A district must meet and negotiate an agreement with the exclusive representative of teachers in the district containing a plan to use the revenue authorized under this section to provide teachers that provide direct services to students with individualized education programs or individualized family services plans four contract days each school year to complete due process forms and procedures. The four days must be equally distributed throughout the school year. The plan must describe the district's staffing plan for the days teachers are completing due process forms and procedures. new text end new text begin (b) If the district and the exclusive representative cannot reach agreement on a staffing plan for the four due process days, the agreement must require the district to use the revenue for substitute teachers to replace the teachers completing due process forms and procedures on due process days. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Due process aid. new text end new text begin (a) A school district that enrolls students is eligible for due process aid. new text end new text begin (b) The Department of Education must calculate the statewide average cost of four additional due process days for teachers providing direct services to students with individualized education programs or individualized family services plans based on the most recent available data. For fiscal year 2026, the department must convert that amount to a statewide allowance per enrollee for school districts and an equivalent amount for each cooperative unit. For fiscal year 2027 and later, the department must reduce the statewide allowances established in 2026 by the statewide average amount of due process day expenses added to eligible special education expenditures for the previous year. new text end new text begin (c) The department must determine the fiscal year 2026 allowances by June 1, 2025, and the fiscal year 2027 allowances by March 15, 2026. The department must establish the allowances for fiscal years 2028 and later by March 15 of the previous year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SPECIAL EDUCATION DUE PROCESS AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Due process aid. new text end new text begin For special education teacher due process aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 125A.081: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end